Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1136.01
Licensed dental assistant; additional functions, procedures, and services.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, may, by rule and regulation, prescribe functions, procedures, and services in addition to those in section 38-1135 which may be performed by a licensed dental assistant under the supervision of a licensed dentist when intended to attain or maintain optimal oral health.

Laws 2017, LB18, § 19.